Utah statutes.
19-3-305.   Application for license.

The application for a construction and operating license shall contain information required by department rules, which shall include:

(1)  results of studies adequate to:

(a)  identify the presence of any groundwater aquifers in the area of the proposed site;

(b)  assess the quality of the groundwater of all aquifers identified in the area of the proposed site;

(c)  provide reports on the monitoring of vadose zone and other near surface groundwater;

(d)  provide reports on hydraulic conductivity tests; and

(e)  provide any other information necessary to estimate adequately the groundwater travel distance;

(2)  identification of transportation routes and transportation plans within the state and demonstration of compliance with federal, state, and local transportation requirements;

(3)  estimates of the composition, quantities, and concentrations of waste to be generated by the activities covered by the license;

(4)  the environmental, social, and economic impact of the facility in the area of the proposed facility and on the state as a whole;

(5)  detailed engineering plans and specifications for the construction and operation of the facility and for the closure of the facility;

(6)  detailed cost estimates and funding sources for construction, operation, and closure of the facility;

(7)  a security plan that includes a detailed description of security measures that would be installed in and around the facility;

(8)  a detailed description of site suitability, including a description of the geologic, geochemical, geotechnical, hydrologic, ecologic, archaeologic, meteorologic, climatologic, and biotic features of the site and vicinity;

(9)  specific identification of:

(a)  the applicant, the wastes to be accepted, the sources of waste, and the owners and operators of the facility; and

(b)  the persons or entities having legal responsibility for the facility and wastes;

(10)  quantitative and qualitative environmental and health risk assessments for all proposed activities, including transfer, storage, and transportation of wastes;

(11)  technical qualifications, including training and experience of the applicant, staff, and personnel who are to engage in the proposed activities;

(12)  a quality assurance program, radiation safety program, and environmental monitoring program;

(13)  a regional emergency plan for an area surrounding the facility having at least a 75 mile radius, but which may be greater, if required by department rule; and

(14)  any other information and monitoring the department determines necessary to insure the protection of the public health and the environment.

